Arkansas, session 2025, HB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-404(a)(3)(A)(i)-(v), concerning
submission of applications for absentee ballots, is amended to read as
follows:
(A) For applications submitted using the form prescribed
in § 7-5-405:
(i) In person at the office of the county clerk of
the county of residence of the voter no later than the time the county
clerk's office regularly closes on the Friday day before election day;
(ii) Applications by mail must be received in the
office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later
than seven (7) days before the election for which the application was made;
(iii) A designated bearer may deliver the completed
application to the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of
the applicant not later than the time the county clerk's office regularly
closes on the Friday day before election day;
(iv) A person declared as the authorized agent of
*SSS013*
01-16-2025 15:29:40 SSS013

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1039
the applicant may deliver the application to the office of the county clerk
of the county of residence of the applicant not later than 1:30 p.m. on the
day of the election;
(v) An administrator may deliver the application in
person at the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the
voter no later than the time the county clerk's office regularly closes on
the Friday day before election day; or

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-411(a)(1)(B)-(D), concerning the
methods of voting absentee, are amended to read as follows:
(B) By delivery of the ballot to the physical office of
the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later than 7:30
p.m. on election day by the designated bearer, administrator, or the
authorized agent of the absentee voter who is medically unable to vote at the
regular polling site, upon proper verification of the signature of the voter
by the county clerk and validation of the identity of the authorized agent;
(C) By delivery of the ballot to the physical office of
the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later than the
time the county clerk's office regularly closes on the Friday before election
day by the registered voter, designated bearer, or administrator of the
absentee voter, upon proper verification of the signature of the voter by the
county clerk and validation of the identity of the registered voter,
designated bearer, or administrator; or
(D)(C) The voter may deliver the ballot to the physical
office of the county clerk of the county of his or her residence not later
than the close of regular business hours on the Friday day before the
election.

/s/A. Collins







01-16-2025 15:29:40 SSS013